New Jersey, session 221, S4363.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Affiliate means any individual or entity that directly or indirectly controls, is under common control with, or is controlled by an electric public utility. Board means the Board of Public Utilities. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within the State. Meeting means a meeting of any committee, user group, task force, or other similar body of PJM. PJM Interconnection, L.L.C. or PJM means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). Recorded vote means a vote that is tabulated, either individually or as part of an industry sector, for any purpose at a meeting, regardless of whether: (1)  the vote represents a final position of the entity casting the vote; or (2)  the entity casting the vote possesses decision-making authority. 1[This term] Recorded vote1 includes proposals that were endorsed by acclamation when the electric public utility was in attendance. b.    No later than February 1 of each year, an electric public utility shall file with the board a report, in a form and manner specified by the board, that: (1)  lists each recorded vote cast by the electric public utility, and by any affiliate of the electric public utility, at a meeting of PJM during the immediately preceding calendar year, regardless of whether the vote is disclosed by PJM; (2)  includes a brief description of what transpired at the meeting, including the purpose of the meeting, the meeting agenda, if any, and what role the electric public utility, or its affiliate, played at the meeting; and (3)  includes a brief description explaining whether each vote identified under paragraph (1) of this subsection furthers the States goals of prioritizing the affordability, reliability, and sustainability of electricity production, consumption, and conservation and furthers the purposes of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-45 et al.), and the Global Warming Response Act, P.L.2007, c.112 (C.26:2C-37 et al.). c.    The board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), summarizing the information received pursuant to subsection b. of this section 1, accompanied by copies of each report filed by an electric public utility pursuant to subsection b. of this section1. d.    The board shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.